Utah statutes.
9-7-203.   Division duties.
The division shall:
(1)  establish, operate, and maintain a state publications collection, a
digital library of state publications, a bibliographic control system, and
depositories as provided in this part;
(2)  cooperate with:
(a)  other agencies to facilitate public access to government information
through electronic networks or other means;
(b)  other state or national libraries or library agencies; and
(c)  the federal government or agencies in accepting federal aid whether in
the form of funds or otherwise;
(3)  receive bequests, gifts, and endowments of money and deposit the funds
with the state treasurer to be placed in the State Library Donation Fund,
which funds shall be held for the purpose, if any, specifically directed by
the donor; and
(4)  receive bequests, gifts, and endowments of property to be held, used, or
disposed of, as directed by the donor, with the approval of the Division of
Finance.
